test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wapamew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wâpamêw - ok : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb -  Wolvengrey p. 401; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 79, 103

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwâpamâw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwâpamâw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwâpamânân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamânaw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwâpamâwâw
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwâpamâwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwâpamâwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwâpamânânak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamânawak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwâpamâwâwak
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kiwâpamin
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kiwâpaminân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kiwâpaminâwâw
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpamêw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wâpamêwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wâpamêyiwa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wâpamimêw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wâpamimêwak

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwâpamimâwaV
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwâpamimâwa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwâpamimânâna
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwâpamimânawa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwâpamimâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-wâpamâw, nikîwâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-wâpamâw, kikîwâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-wâpamânân, nikîwâpamânân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-wâpamânaw, kikîwâpamânaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-wâpamâwâw, kikîwâpamâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-wâpamâwak, nikîwâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-wâpamâwak, kikîwâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-wâpamânânak, nikîwâpamânânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-wâpamânawak, kikîwâpamânawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-wâpamâwâwak, kikîwâpamâwâwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-wâpamin, kikîwâpamin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-wâpaminân, kikîwâpaminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-wâpaminâwâw, kikîwâpaminâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-wâpamêw, kîwâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-wâpamêwak, kîwâpamêwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-wâpamêyiwa, kîwâpamêyiwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-wâpamimêw, kîwâpamimêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-wâpamimêwak, kîwâpamimêwak]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-wâpamimâwa, nikîwâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-wâpamimâwa, kikîwâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-wâpamimânâna, nikîwâpamimânâna]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-wâpamimânawa, kikîwâpamimânawa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-wâpamimâwâwa, kikîwâpamimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-wâpamâw, nikawâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-wâpamâw, kikawâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-wâpamânân, nikawâpamânân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-wâpamânaw, kikawâpamânaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-wâpamâwâw, kikawâpamâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-wâpamâwak, nikawâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-wâpamâwak, kikawâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-wâpamânânak, nikawâpamânânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-wâpamânawak, kikawâpamânawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-wâpamâwâwak, kikawâpamâwâwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-wâpamin, kikawâpamin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-wâpaminân, kikawâpaminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-wâpaminâwâw, kikawâpaminâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-wâpamêw, kawâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-wâpamêwak, kawâpamêwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-wâpamêyiwa, kawâpamêyiwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-wâpamimêw, kawâpamimêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-wâpamimêwak, kawâpamimêwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-wâpamimâwa, nikawâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-wâpamimâwa, kikawâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-wâpamimânâna, nikawâpamimânâna]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-wâpamimânawa, kikawâpamimânawa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-wâpamimâwâwa, kikawâpamimâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wâpamâw, niwîwâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wâpamâw, kiwîwâpamâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wâpamânân, niwîwâpamânân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wâpamânaw, kiwîwâpamânaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wâpamâwâw, kiwîwâpamâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wâpamâwak, niwîwâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wâpamâwak, kiwîwâpamâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wâpamânânak, niwîwâpamânânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wâpamânawak, kiwîwâpamânawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wâpamâwâwak, kiwîwâpamâwâwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wâpamin, kiwîwâpamin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wâpaminân, kiwîwâpaminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wâpaminâwâw, kiwîwâpaminâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêw, wîwâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêwak, wîwâpamêwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêyiwa, wîwâpamêyiwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamimêw, wîwâpamimêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamimêwak, wîwâpamimêwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wâpamimâwa, niwîwâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wâpamimâwa, kiwîwâpamimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wâpamimânâna, niwîwâpamimânâna]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wâpamimânawa, kiwîwâpamimânawa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wâpamimâwâwa, kiwîwâpamimâwâwa]

     
     
     


     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwâpamikonân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwâpamikonaw
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwâpamikowâw
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwâpamikonânak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwâpamikonawak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwâpamikowâwak
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kiwâpamitin inv
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kiwâpamitinân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kiwâpamitinâwâw
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wâpamikwak
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wâpamikoyiwa
          
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwâpamikoyiwa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwâpamikoyiwa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwâpamikonâna
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwâpamikonawa
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwâpamikowâwa
     
     
     
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamak, êwâpamak]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wâpamat, êwâpamat]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyâhk, êwâpamâyâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyahk, êwâpamâyahk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamâyêk, êwâpamâyêk]
	 
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-wâpamakik, êwâpamakik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-wâpamacik, êwâpamacik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyâhkik, êwâpamâyâhkik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyahkok, êwâpamâyahkok]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamâyêkok, êwâpamâyêkok] 
     
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiyan, êwâpamiyan]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-wâpamiyâhk, êwâpamiyâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiyêk, êwâpamiyêk]    
     
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamât, êwâpamât]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamâcik, êwâpamâcik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimât, êwâpamimât]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimâcik, êwâpamimâcik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamâyit, êwâpamâyit]
     
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimak, êwâpamimak]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimat, êwâpamimat]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimâyâhk, êwâpamimâyâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimâyahk, êwâpamimâyahk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamimâyek, êwâpamimâyek]
   
   
   
   
   
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wâpamit, êwâpamit]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wâpamisk, êwâpamisk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyâhk, êwâpamikoyâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyahk, êwâpamikoyahk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyek, êwâpamikoyek]
	 
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wâpamicik, êwâpamicik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wâpamiskik, êwâpamiskik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyâhkik, êwâpamikoyâhkik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyahkok, êwâpamikoyahkok]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyêkok, êwâpamikoyêkok]
	 
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-wâpamitân, êwâpamitân]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamitâhk, êwâpamitâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-wâpamitakok, êwâpamitakok]
	 
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-wâpamikot, êwâpamikot]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-wâpamikocik, êwâpamikocik]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyit, êwâpamikoyit]
          
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-wâpamiyit, êwâpamiyit]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-wâpamiyisk, êwâpamiyisk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyâhk, êwâpamikoyâhk, ê-wâpamikowâyâhk, êwâpamikowâyâhk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyêk, êwâpamikoyêk, ê-wâpamikowâyêk, êwâpamikowâyêk]
     PV/e+wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-wâpamikoyahk, êwâpamikoyahk, ê-wâpamikowâyahk, êwâpamikowâyahk]
     




     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [wâpamak, wâpamak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [wâpamat, wâpamat]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [wâpamâyâhk, wâpamâyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [wâpamâyahk, wâpamâyahk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [wâpamâyêk, wâpamâyêk]
